Maryland, session 2025, HB0071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE HOLOCAUST EDUCATION
ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A HOLOCAUST EDUCATION ASSISTANCE GRANT
PROGRAM IN THE STATE.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS WITH HOLOCAUST EDUCATION IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
(C) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A
GRANT FROM THE PROGRAM.
(D) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY USE A GRANT ONLY FOR
HOLOCAUST–RELATED:
(1) TEACHER TRAINING; OR
(2) TEACHING MATERIALS.
– 1 –

Ch. 317 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(E) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000 $50,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(2) NO LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL RECEIVE MORE THAN $50,000
AS A GRANT FROM THE PROGRAM IN A FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –